Utah statutes.
75-1-309.   Oath or affirmation on filed documents.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code or by rule, every document filed with the court under this code, including applications, petitions, and demands for notice, shall be deemed to include an oath, affirmation, or statement to the effect that its representations are true as far as the person executing or filing it knows or is informed; and penalties for perjury may follow deliberate falsification therein.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

